fi: Kankaan käyttötarkoitus: Vaatteet; Vuodevaatteet; Askartelu/ompelu; Verhot/sivuverhot; Pukuompelu; Kirjonta/käsityöt; Sisustus; Päällysvaatteet; Housut/hameet; Tilkkutyöt; Paidat; Irtopäälliset; Pöytäliinat; Pyyhkeet/keittiöpyyhkeet; Verhoilu; Muu
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานของผ้า: เครื่องแต่งกาย; เครื่องนอน; งานฝีมือ/งานเย็บปักถักร้อย; ผ้าม่าน/ม่านจีบ; การตัดเย็บเสื้อผ้า; งานปัก/งานเย็บปักถักร้อย; ของตกแต่งบ้าน; เสื้อตัวนอก; กางเกง/กระโปรง; งานควิลท์; เสื้อเชิ้ต; ปลอกหุ้มเฟอร์นิเจอร์; ผ้าปูโต๊ะ; ผ้าขนหนู/ผ้าเช็ดจาน; วัสดุบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; อื่นๆ
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của vải: Trang phục; Bộ đồ giường; Thủ công/may vá; Rèm/màn che; May mặc; Thêu/đan lát; Trang trí nhà cửa; Áo khoác ngoài; Quần/chân váy; Chần bông; Vải may áo sơ mi; Vỏ bọc đồ nội thất; Khăn trải bàn; Khăn tắm/khăn lau bếp; Bọc nệm; Khác
nl: Beoogd gebruik stof: Kleding; Beddengoed; Knutselen/naaien; Gordijnen/draperieën; Kleding maken; Borduren/handwerken; Woondecoratie; Bovenkleding; Broeken/rokken; Quilten; Overhemden; Hoezen; Tafellinnen; Handdoeken/theedoeken; Stoffering; Overig
pl: Przeznaczenie tkaniny: Odzież; Pościel; Rękodzieło / szycie; Zasłony / kotary; Krawiectwo; Haft / robótki ręczne; Wystrój wnętrz; Odzież wierzchnia; Spodnie / spódnice; Pikowanie; Na koszule; Pokrowce; Obrusy; Ręczniki / ściereczki; Tapicerstwo; Inne
sv: Avsedd användning av tyg: Kläder; Sängkläder; Pyssel/sömnad; Gardiner/draperier; Klädsömnad; Broderi/handarbete; Heminredning; Ytterkläder; Byxor/kjolar; Quiltning; Skjorttyg; Överdragsklädsel; Bordslinne; Handdukar/kökshanddukar; Möbelklädsel; Övrigt
lt-LT: Numatytoji audinio paskirtis: Drabužiai; Patalynė; Rankdarbiai / siuvimas; Užuolaidos / draperijos; Drabužių siuvimas; Siuvinėjimas / rankdarbiai; Namų dekoras; Viršutiniai drabužiai; Kelnės / sijonai; Daigstymas; Marškiniai; Uždangalai; Stalo tekstilė; Rankšluosčiai / virtuviniai rankšluosčiai; Apmušalai; Kitas
it: Uso previsto del tessuto: Abbigliamento; Biancheria da letto; Artigianato/cucito; Tende/tendaggi; Sartoria; Ricamo/lavoro ad ago; Decorazione d’interni; Capispalla; Pantaloni/gonne; Trapuntatura; Tessuto per camicie; Fodere per divani; Biancheria da tavola; Asciugamani/strofinacci; Tappezzeria; Altro
ru: Назначение ткани: Одежда; Постельное белье; Рукоделие/шитье; Шторы/портьеры; Пошив одежды; Вышивка/рукоделие; Домашний декор; Верхняя одежда; Брюки/юбки; Квилтинг; Сорочки; Чехлы; Столовое белье; Полотенца/кухонные полотенца; Обивка; Другое
hu: Szövet rendeltetésszerű használata: Ruházat; Ágynemű; Kézművesség/varrás; Függönyök/drapériák; Ruhakészítés; Hímzés/kézimunka; Lakberendezés; Felsőruházat; Nadrágok/szoknyák; Foltvarrás; Inganyag; Bútorhuzatok; Asztalterítők; Törölközők/konyharuhák; Kárpit; Egyéb
sk-SK: Určené použitie tkaniny: Oblečenie; Posteľná bielizeň; Ručné práce/šitie; Záclony/závesy; Krajčírstvo; Výšivka/vyšívanie; Bytový textil; Vrchné odevy; Nohavice/sukne; Prešívanie; Košeľoviny; Poťahy; Stolová bielizeň; Uteráky/utierky; Čalúnenie; Iný
tr: Kumaş kullanım amacı: Giyim; Nevresim; El işi/dikiş; Perde/drapelik; Terzilik; Nakış/el işi; Ev dekorasyonu; Dış giyim; Pantolon/etek; Kapitone; Gömleklik; Kılıf; Masa örtüsü; Havlu/kurulama bezi; Döşeme; Diğer
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση υφάσματος: Ένδυση; Κλινοσκεπάσματα; Χειροτεχνία/Ραπτική; Κουρτίνες/ριντό; Ραπτική ρούχων; Κέντημα/Εργόχειρο; Διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Εξωτερικά ενδύματα; Παντελόνια/Φούστες; Καπιτονέ; Πουκάμισα; Καλύμματα επίπλων; Λευκά είδη τραπεζαρίας; Πετσέτες/Πετσέτες κουζίνας; Ταπετσαρία επίπλων; Άλλο
pt-PT: Utilização prevista do tecido: Vestuário; Roupa de cama; Artesanato/costura; Cortinas/reposteiros; Costura; Bordado/trabalho de agulha; Decoração para a casa; Vestuário de exterior; Calças/saias; Acolchoamento; Tecido para camisas; Capas para sofás; Roupa de mesa; Toalhas/panos de cozinha; Estofos; Outro
de: Vorgesehene Verwendung des Stoffes: Bekleidung; Bettzeug; Basteln/Nähen; Vorhänge/Gardinen; Schneiderei; Stickerei/Handarbeiten; Wohnkultur; Oberbekleidung; Hosen/Röcke; Quilten; Hemdenstoff; Schonbezüge; Tischwäsche; Handtücher/Geschirrtücher; Polsterung; Sonstiges
cs: Účel použití látky: Oděvy; Lůžkoviny; Tvoření/šití; Záclony/závěsy; Dámské krejčovství; Výšivka/vyšívání; Bytové dekorace; Svrchní oděvy; Kalhoty/sukně; Quilting; Košiloviny; Potahy; Stolní textilie; Ručníky/utěrky; Čalounění; Jiné
fr: Utilisation prévue du tissu: Vêtements; Literie; Artisanat/couture; Rideaux/tentures; Confection de vêtements; Broderie/travaux d’aiguille; Décoration intérieure; Vêtements d’extérieur; Pantalons/jupes; Courtepointe; Tissu pour chemises; Housses; Linge de table; Serviettes/torchons; Ameublement; Autre
pt-BR: Uso pretendido do tecido: Vestuário; Roupas de cama; Artesanato/costura; Cortinas/cortinados; Confecção de vestidos; Bordado/costura; Decoração de casa; Agasalhos; Calças/saias; Quilting; Camisaria; Capas para móveis; Roupas de mesa; Toalhas/panos de prato; Estofado; Outros
es: Uso previsto para la tela: Ropa; Ropa de cama; Manualidades/costura; Cortinas/tapicería; Confección de vestidos; Bordado/costura; Decoración del hogar; Ropa de abrigo; Pantalones/faldas; Acolchado; Camisería; Fundas protectoras; Mantelería; Toallas/paños de cocina; Tapicería; Otro
bg-BG: Предназначение на плата: Облекло; Спално бельо; Занаяти/шиене; Завеси/драперии; Рокли; Бродерия/ръкоделие; Домашен декор; Връхни дрехи; Панталони/поли; Капитониране; Ризи; Калъфи за мебели; Покривки; Кърпи/кухненски кърпи; Тапицерия; Друго
ro-RO: Utilizarea prevăzută a țesăturii: Îmbrăcăminte; Lenjerie de pat; Artizanat/cusut; Perdele/draperii; Croitorie; Broderie/lucru manual; Decorațiuni interioare; Îmbrăcăminte de exterior; Pantaloni/fuste; Matlasare; Cămăși; Huse detașabile; Lenjerii de masă; Prosoape/șervete de bucătărie; Tapițerie; Altele
ja: 生地使用目的: アパレル; 寝具; クラフト/手芸; カーテン/ドレープ; 洋裁; 刺繍/手芸; ホームデコ; アウターウェア; パンツ/スカート; キルティング; シャツ地; スリップカバー; テーブルリネン; タオル/ティータオル; 室内装飾; その他
da: Tilsigtet brug for stoffet: Beklædning; Sengetøj; Håndværk/syning; Gardiner/forhæng; Kjolesyning; Broderi/håndarbejde; Boligindretning; Overtøj; Bukser/nederdele; Quiltning; Skjortestof; Møbelovertræk; Duge og servietter; Håndklæder/viskestykker; Møbelpolstring; Andet
zh-TW: 布料預期用途: 服飾; 寢具; 手工藝/縫紉; 窗簾/布幔; 裁縫; 刺繡/針線活; 家居裝飾; 外套; 褲子/裙子; 絎縫; 襯衫布料; 椅套; 桌布; 毛巾/茶巾; 室內裝飾布; 其他
sl-SI: Namen uporabe blaga: Oblačila; Posteljnina; Ročna dela/šivanje; Zavese/draperija; Šivanje oblek; Vezenje/ročno delo; Dekoracija za dom; Vrhnja oblačila; Hlače/krila; Prešivanje; Srajce; Prevleke; Namizno perilo; Brisače/kuhinjske krpe; Oblazinjenje; Drugo
hr-HR: Namjena tkanine: Odjeća; Posteljina; Rukotvorine/šivanje; Zavjese/draperije; Šivanje odjeće; Vez / ručni rad; Kućni dekor; Gornja odjeća; Hlače/suknje; Prošivanje; Tkanina za košulje; Navlake; Stolno rublje; Ručnici / kuhinjske krpe; Tapeciranje; Ostalo
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av stoff: Klær; Sengetøy; Håndarbeid/søm; Gardiner/forheng; Kjolesøm; Broderi/håndarbeid; Interiør; Yttertøy; Bukser/skjørt; Quilting; Skjortesøm; Møbeltrekk; Duker og servietter; Håndklær/kjøkkenhåndklær; Møbeltrekk; Annet
ko: 패브릭 권장 용도: 의류; 침구류; 공예/재봉; 커튼/드레이퍼리; 드레스 제작; 자수/수예; 홈 데코; 아우터웨어; 바지/스커트; 퀼팅; 셔츠용; 슬립커버; 테이블 리넨; 수건/티 타월; 실내 장식; 기타
en: Fabric intended use: Apparel; Bedding; Craft/sewing; Curtains/drapery; Dressmaking; Embroidery/needlework; Home decor; Outerwear; Pants/skirts; Quilting; Shirting; Slipcovers; Table linens; Towels/tea towels; Upholstery; Other
zh-CN: 面料预期用途: 服装; 床上用品; 手工/缝纫; 窗帘/帷幔; 服装制作; 刺绣/针线活; 家居装饰; 外套; 裤子/裙子; 绗缝; 衬衫用料; 沙发套; 桌布; 毛巾/茶巾; 室内装潢; 其他